Washington statutes.
RCW 2.36.052

Courts of limited jurisdiction—Performance of jury management activities by superior court authorized.

Pursuant to an agreement between the judge or judges of each superior court and the judge or judges of each court of limited jurisdiction, jury management activities may be performed by the superior court for any county or judicial district as provided by statute.

[ 1988 c 188 s 20.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1988 c 188: See notes following RCW 2.36.010.